Alaska statutes. Title 46. Water, Air, Energy, and Environmental Conservation.
Chapter 13. Hazardous Substance Spill Technology Review Council.

Secs. 46.13.010 — 46.13.090.
Alaska State Emergency Response Commission. [Repealed § 28 ch 32 SLA 1994. For current law, see AS 26.23.071 — 26.23.077.]

Secs. 46.13.100 — 46.13.900.
Hazardous Substance Spill Technology Review Council. [Repealed, § 102 ch 21 SLA 2000.]